Tennessee, session 114, HB1153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2302, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting instead the following:
(a) Each local board of education shall establish a school lunch program and a
school breakfast program that provides a free lunch and breakfast to each student
enrolled in a school under the board's jurisdiction who is eligible for free or reduced-price
meals, according to rules established under § 49-6-2303.
(b) Subject to available funding, the state shall reimburse each LEA the cost of
providing a free breakfast and lunch served to each student enrolled in the LEA who is
eligible for reduced price meals after all federal funds available pursuant to the national
school lunch program created by the National School Lunch Act (42 U.S.C. § 1751 et
seq.), the school breakfast program created by the Child Nutrition Act of 1966 (42 U.S.C.
§ 1771 et seq.), or any other federal program have been applied.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2303, is amended by deleting
the language ", regardless of its participation" in subdivision (5) and by deleting subdivision (10).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-114(a), is amended by deleting
"receive free or reduced-price school lunches" and substituting "are members of households
with an income that meet the eligibility requirements for free or reduced-price lunch as
determined pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1758".
HB1153
002379
- 1 -

SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter.
- 2 - 002379